Washington statutes.
RCW 39.36.050

Ballot proposition authorizing indebtedness—Excess property tax levies.

The governing body of a taxing district desiring to place a ballot proposition authorizing indebtedness before the voters may submit the proposition at any special election held on the dates authorized in RCW 29A.04.330. The ballot proposition shall include the maximum amount of the indebtedness to be authorized, the maximum term any bonds may have, a description of the purpose or purposes of the bond issue, and whether excess property tax levies authorized under RCW 84.52.056 will be authorized.

When it is required that such bonds be retired by excess property tax levies, or when the governing body desires such bonds be retired by excess property tax levies, the ballot proposition shall also include authorization for such excess bond retirement property tax levies provided under RCW 84.52.056.

Notice of the proposed election shall be published as required by RCW 29A.52.355.

[ 2015 c 53 s 69; 1984 c 186 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.